Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,130
Group and individual contracts; additional required provisions.

(1) An individual contract shall provide a ten-day period to examine and return the contract and have the premium refunded. If services were received during the ten-day period and the person returns the contract to receive a refund of the premium paid, he or she shall pay for such services.

(2) A group or individual contract shall permit enrollees to voluntarily terminate enrollment for any reason at any time.

(3) A group contract shall permit enrollees to convert to individual enrollment upon termination of enrollment in the group.

(4) A group contract shall not contain provisions that are in conflict with sections 44-3,144 to 44-3,150.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 39;

Laws 1994, LB 1224, § 80.